Delaware, session 153, HB383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 5916, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5916. Uniform pay plan; hazardous duty pay. (g) (1) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2024, nonexempt Department of Transportation employees shall be paid overtime at the rate of time and Â½ after the employee has accrued 37.5 compensable hours that week. (2) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2026, all of the following Department of Transportation employees shall be paid overtime at the rate of time and Â½ after the employee has accrued 37.5 compensable hours that week: a. Administrative Specialist. b. Assistant Area Supervisor. c. Automotive Supervisor I. d. Automotive Supervisor II. e. Conservation Technician IV. f. Engineering Technician I. g. Engineering Technician II. h. Engineering Technician III. i. Graphics and Printing Supervisor. j. Highway Equipment Superintendent. k. Intelligent Transportation System Supervisor. l . Intelligent Transportation System Technician I. m. Intelligent Transportation System Technician II. n. Intelligent Transportation System Technician III. o. Intelligent Transportation System Technician IV. p. Maintenance Area Supervisor I. q. Maintenance Area Supervisor II. r. Purchasing Service Coordinator I. s. Roadside Environmental Specialist. t. Traffic Sign Installation Supervisor. SYNOPSIS This Substitute for House Bill No. 383 specifies by position title which Department of Transportation employees must be paid overtime after working 37.5 hours in a week beginning July 1, 2026.